Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3114.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 57 O.S. 2021, Section 510.9, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 510.9. A. There is hereby created the Electronic
Monitoring Program for inmates in the custody of the Department of
Corrections who are sentenced for a nonviolent offense crime not
included as a violent offense crime defined in Section 571 of this
title. The Department is authorized to use an electronic monitoring
global positioning device to satisfy its custody duties and
responsibilities.

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3114 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

B. After an inmate has been processed and received through a
Department Assessment and Reception Center, has a home offer, and
has met the criteria established in subsection C of Section 521 of
this title, the Director of the Department of Corrections may assign
the inmate, if eligible, to the Electronic Monitoring Program. The
following inmates, youthful offenders, and juveniles shall not be
eligible for assignment to the program:
1. Any inmate Inmates who have completed less than twenty
percent (20%) of their sentence;
2. Inmates serving a sentence of more than ten (10) years who
has have one thousand ninety-five (1,095) days or more left on the
sentence;
2. 3. Inmates convicted of a violent offense crime within the
previous ten (10) years or convicted of a violation enumerated in
Section 13.1 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
3. 4. Inmates convicted pursuant to Section 11-902 of Title 47
of the Oklahoma Statutes who are not receptive to substance abuse
treatment and follow-up treatment;
4. 5. Inmates deemed by the Department to be a security risk or
threat to the public;
5. 6. Inmates requiring educational, medical, or other services
or programs not available in a community setting as determined by
the Department;

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3114 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

6. 7. Inmates convicted of any crime related to domestic abuse
as provided for in Section 644 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
or who have an active protection order that was issued under the
Protection from Domestic Abuse Act;
7. 8. Inmates who have outstanding felony warrants or detainers
from another jurisdiction;
8. 9. Inmates convicted of a sex offense who, upon release from
incarceration, would be required by law to register pursuant to the
Sex Offender Offenders Registration Act;
9. 10. Inmates convicted for any crime against a child or abuse
pursuant to Section 843.5 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
10. 11. Inmates convicted of exploitation of a vulnerable adult
pursuant to Section 843.3 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
11. 12. Inmates convicted of racketeering activity as defined
in Section 1402 of Title 22 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
12. 13. Inmates convicted pursuant to subsection F of Section
2-401 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
13. 14. Inmates convicted pursuant to Section 650 of Title 21
of the Oklahoma Statutes;
14. 15. Inmates convicted of driving under the influence
resulting in great bodily injury pursuant to subsection B of Section
11-904 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3114 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

16. Inmates who have escaped from a medium or maximum custody
penal or correctional institution within the previous ten (10)
years; or
15. 17. Inmates who currently have active misconduct actions on
file with the Department of Corrections.
C. Every eligible inmate assigned to the Electronic Monitoring
Program shall remain in such program until one of the following
conditions has been met:
1. The inmate discharges the term of the sentence;
2. The inmate is removed from the Electronic Monitoring Program
for violation of any rule or condition of the program and reassigned
to imprisonment in a correctional facility; or
3. The inmate is paroled by the Governor pursuant to Section
332.7 of this title.
D. After an inmate has been assigned to the Electronic
Monitoring Program, denial of parole pursuant to Section 332.7 of
this title, shall not be cause for removal from the program,
provided the inmate has not violated the rules or conditions of the
program. The inmate may remain assigned to the program, if
otherwise eligible, until the completion of the sentence. Loss of
eligibility for the program shall result in removal of the inmate
from the program.
E. The Electronic Monitoring Program shall require active
supervision of the inmate in a community setting by a correctional
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3114 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

offi cer or other employee of the Department of Corrections with
monitoring by a global positioning device approved by the Department
under such rules and conditions as may be established by the
Department. If an inmate violates any rule or condition of the
program, the Department may take necessary disciplinary action
consistent with the rules established pursuant to this section
including reassignment to a higher level of security or removing the
inmate from the program with reassignment to imprisonment in a
correctional facility. Any inmate who escapes from the Electronic
Monitoring Program shall be subject to the provisions of Section 443
of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
F. Upon an inmate assigned to the Electronic Monitoring Program
becoming eligible for parole consideration, pursuant to Section
332.7 of this title, the Department of Corrections shall deliver the
inmate, in person, to a correctional facility for an interview,
together with any Department records necessary for the Pardon and
Parole Board’s investigation. Inmates assigned to the Electronic
Monitoring Program shall not be allowed to waive consideration or
recommendation for parole.
G. Prior to placement of any eligible inmate assigned to the
Electronic Monitoring Program being placed in a community setting,
the Department of Corrections shall deliver a written notification
to the sheriff and district attorney of the county, and the chief
law enforcement officer of any incorporated city or town in which
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3114 SFLR Page 5
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

the inmate is to be monitored and supervised under the program. The
Department of Corrections shall provide notice of the projected date
of release of an inmate to the designated Oklahoma victim
notification service provider within sixty (60) days but not less
than seven (7) days prior to the projected date of release of the
inmate.
H. An inmate assigned to the Electronic Monitoring Program may
be required to pay the Department of Corrections for all or part of
any monitoring equipment or fee, substance abuse treatment program
or follow-up treatment expense, supervision cost, or other costs
while assigned to the program. The Department shall determine
whether the inmate has the ability to pay all or part of such fee or
costs.
I. The Department of Corrections shall develop policies and
procedures necessary to implement the Electronic Monitoring Program
including, but not limited to, methods of monitoring and
supervision, disciplinary action, reassignment to higher and lower
security levels, removal from the program, and costs of monitoring
and supervision to be paid by the inmate, if any.
J. An inmate assigned to the Electronic Monitoring Program
shall, within thirty (30) days of being placed in a community
setting, report to the court clerk and the district attorney of the
county from which the judgment and sentence resulting in

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3114 SFLR Page 6
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

inca rceration arose to address payment of any fines, costs,
restitution, and assessments owed by the inmate, if any.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON JUDICIARY
April 21, 2026 - DO PASS AS AMENDED BY CS




















SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3114 SFLR Page 7
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)